Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414.09
Continuing education requirements;
failure to complete; effect; fine.

(1) Failure to complete the continuing
education requirements of sections 81-1414.07 and 81-1414.08 shall result
in the suspension of a law enforcement officer's certificate or diploma from
the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center and a fine under section 81-1403
until the continuing education is completed unless the officer is able to
show good cause for not completing the continuing education requirements or
unless a waiver has been granted.

(2)
Any law enforcement officer who fails to fulfill his or her continuing education
requirements for two consecutive reporting periods may have his or her certificate
or diploma from the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center revoked and a
fine incurred under section 81-1403 unless the officer is able to show good
cause for not completing the continuing education requirements or unless a
waiver has been granted.

Laws 2012, LB817, § 15.